Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.010

Definitions.

(1) As used in this chapter, the term "earnings" means compensation paid or payable to an individual for personal services, whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and includes periodic payments pursuant to a governmental or nongovernmental pension or retirement program.

(2) As used in this chapter, the term "disposable earnings" means that part of earnings remaining after the deduction from those earnings of any amounts required by law to be withheld.

[ 2012 c 159 s 1; 2003 c 222 s 16; 1987 c 442 s 1001.]